Virginia statutes. Title 10.1. Conservation.
Chapter 8. Historic Landmarks and Monuments.

§§ 10.1-800 through 10.1-817.

Repealed by Acts 1989, c. 656.

Cross references.

For new chapters relating to historic resources, antiquities, and historic preservation, see Chapters 22 and 24.1 of Title 10.1.

Editor’s note.

Repealed Chapter 8 of Title 10.1, relating to historic landmarks and monuments, was enacted as part of Title 10.1 by Acts 1988, c. 891.

Repealed §§ 10.1-812, 10.1-813 and 10.1-814 were amended by Acts 1989, c. 711. Effect has been given in §§

10.1-2211

,

10.1-2212

and

10.1-2213

, respectively, to these amendments.